Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5470.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Material litigation" means litigation that, according to generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to an applicant's or a licensee's financial health and must be disclosed in the applicant's or licensee's audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or similar records. (b) "Money" means a medium of exchange authorized or adopted by the United States or a foreign government as a part of its currency that is customarily used and accepted as a medium of exchange in the country of issuance. The term includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between 2 or more governments. (c) "Money transmission services" means selling or issuing payment instruments or closed-loop prepaid access or prepaid access devices or vehicles or receiving money or monetary value for transmission. It also includes owning, operating, facilitating, soliciting, marketing, or advertising a virtual currency kiosk. The term does not include the provision solely of delivery, online, or telecommunications services or network access. (d) "Outstanding payment instrument" means any check, draft, money order, travelers check, other written instrument, electronic or wire transfer, closed-loop prepaid access or prepaid access device or vehicle, or facsimile issued by a licensee that has been sold in the United States directly by the licensee or any payment instrument issued by the licensee that has been sold by the licensee or an authorized delegate in the United States, that has been reported to the licensee as having been sold, and that has not yet been paid by or for the licensee. (e) "Payee" means the provider of goods or services, not including money transmission services, that is owed payment of money or other monetary value from the person that is paying for the goods or services. (f) "Payment instrument" means any electronic or written check, draft, money order, travelers check, or other wire, electronic, or written instrument or order for the transmission or payment of money, sold or issued to 1 or more persons, regardless of whether or not the instrument is negotiable. The term includes any closed-loop prepaid access or prepaid access device or vehicle. The term does not include any credit card voucher, letter of credit, or tangible object redeemable by the issuer in goods or services. (g) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal entity. (h) "Prepaid access" means access to funds or the value of funds that have been paid in advance and can be retrieved or transferred at some point in the future through a device or vehicle. The term does not include closed-loop prepaid access. (i) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. (j) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or protectorate of the United States. (k) "Travelers check" means an instrument for the payment of money or a foreign currency instrument in any denomination that provides for both of the following: (i) A specimen signature of the purchaser to be completed at the time of purchase of the instrument. (ii) A countersignature of the purchaser to be completed when the instrument is negotiated. (l) "Virtual currency kiosk" means that term as defined in section 3 of the virtual currency kiosk consumer protection act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. ____ (request no. H03238'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.